src/twol-smj.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no


! ========================================================================== !
!                   Lule Sámi morphophonological rule set                    !
! ========================================================================== !

! twol-smj.txt
! The file contains the rule set for the non-segmental
! Lule Sámi morphphonological rules

! m4 rules for selecting parts of the file to a certain application.
changequote(<<,>>)
changecom(<<!>>,<<
>>)
define(<<FLAGINIT>>,
<<ifdef(<<$1>>,<<define(<<$1>>,1)>>,<<define(<<$1>>,0)>>)>>)dnl
dnl
define(<<DIVNUM>>,0)dnl
define(<<ENDOMIT>>,<<popdef(<<DIVNUM>>)divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<ENDKEEP>>,<<popdef(<<DIVNUM>>)divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<OMITIF>>,
  <<pushdef(<<DIVNUM>>,ifelse(eval($1),0,0,-1))divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<KEEPIF>>,
  <<pushdef(<<DIVNUM>>,ifelse(eval($1),0,-1,0))divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<ELSE>>,
  <<define(<<DIVNUM>>,ifelse(DIVNUM,0,-1,0))divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl

FLAGINIT(<<HYPHENATE>>)
FLAGINIT(<<SHORTCOMP>>)
FLAGINIT(<<DIPHSIMPL>>)
FLAGINIT(<<HUNSPELL>>)

Alphabet
 a á b c d e f g h i j k l m n ñ ń ŋ o p q			! small
 r s t u v w x y z å ä ø ö å æ:æ æ:ä %-
 é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý
 ç č đ ð š ŧ þ ß ª

 A Á B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ Ń Ŋ O P Q			! capital
 R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ø Ö Å Æ:Æ Æ:Ä
 É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý
 Ç Č Đ Ð Š Ŧ þ

! ':0			            ! Gradation mark
 ':0 %/ '7:'            ! From sme.

KEEPIF(HYPHENATE)
 #   %^                     ! Compound boundary and hyphenation mark (hyphenation version)
ELSE
 #:0 %^:0                   ! Compound boundary and hyphenation mark
ENDKEEP

 e7:e i7:i o7:o o9:o u7:u z9:z   ! Morphophonemes  in sme, here temporarily due to common propernoun file

 h8:h g8:g m8:m n8:n		                    ! these are deleted in nom
 b9:b d9:d g9:g l9:l m9:m n9:n h9:h r9:r    	! these can not occur before #
 k9:k t9:t s9:s p9:p                            ! Non-sámi cons clusters
 a9:a e9:e o9:o æ9:æ Æ9:Æ ä9:ä Ä9:Ä
 ö9:ö Ö9:Ö ø9:ø Ø9:Ø                  ! Wd-final foreign vow, and non-fluctuating æ/ä

 X1:0 X2:0 X3:0 X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0   ! Diacritics
 Q1:0 Q2:0 Q3:0 Q4:0 Q5:0 Q6:0 Q7:0 Q8:0 Q9:0   ! They trigger morphophono-
 Y1:0 Y2:0 Y3:0 Y4:0 Y5:0 Y6:0 Y7:0 Y8:0 Y9:0   ! logical rules
 
OMITIF(HUNSPELL)
 %>:0 »:0	! stem-suffix border mark
ELSE
 %> »:%>		! stem-suffix border mark, only visible in Hunspell
ENDOMIT

;

Sets
 Vow     = a á e i o u y æ ä ø ö å
           A Á E I O U Y Æ Ä Ø Ä Å
           é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý
           É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý
           a9 e9 o9 æ9 ä9
                 Æ9 Ä9;
 æä      = æ ä ;
 Cns     = b b9 c d d9 f g g8 g9 h h8 h9 j k l l9 m m8 m9 n n8 n9 ŋ ñ ń p q r r9 s t v w x z z9 ' ; ! All consonants
 Cns7    =      c      f         h       j   l    m       n       ŋ ñ ń p q r    s t v w x z   ; ! Surface cons excl 1st members of xx-type G3
 Cns8    = b    c d    f g       h       j k l    m       n       ŋ ñ ń p q r    s t v w x z   ; ! All surface consonants
 Cns9    =   b9     d9     g8 g9   h8 h9       l9   m8 m9   n8 n9             r9             ' ; ! Underlying consonants
 Cns4    =             f                     l    m       n       ŋ ñ ń     r        v         ; ! Don't remember
 StemCns = b b9   d d9   g g8 g9 h h8 h9 j   l l9 m m8 m9 n n8 n9 ŋ ñ ń     r r9 s             ; ! Can occur stem-finally
 DelCns  =                 g8      h8               m8      n8                                 ; ! deleted in nom...
 WeG     = X2 X3 X7 Y5 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q6 ;
 Dummy   = X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 %> » %^ ;
 Hyph = %- ;

Definitions

 LCnsPhon7 = [ :Cns7 | :n :j | :s :j | :t :j | :t :s ] ;     ! Using Cns7, excluding 1st member of two-cns G3
 LCnsPhon  = [ :Cns8 | :n :j | :s :j | :t :j | :t :s ] ;     ! Using Cns8, without the previous restriction

!     G3:G2 Here we document our alternation patterns
! S7 kkn:k0n
! S8 f'f:f0f
! S9 jgg:j0g
! S4 hkk:h0k
! S5  xy:zy (no zeros)
! S6  xx:yy (no zeros)
! S7  xy:zy (no zeros)
! S8        (no cg)

 LowerG2   = [
               [
                  (Cns:0)  LCnsPhon7 (Cns:0) LCnsPhon (Cns:0)            ! xy that cannot be G3, since x cannot form xy G3.
               |                                                         ! nijbe,
                  [           ! This section is for 3-cons G2. and for 2cns G2 that share the initial cns with 2cns G3
                     (Cns:0) [:j|:l|:m|:n|:v] (Cns:0) :s :t                  ! S9, 3cns-G2 bäjstov, etc.
                  |
                     (Cns:0) [ :l | :r | :n | :j ]      (Cns:0) :s :k                   ! S9, 3cns-G2 sválskes, etc.
                  |
                     (Cns:0) [  ! 2cns G2 that share the initial cns wit 2cns G3
                                :b (Cns:0) [ :d | :m | :j | :l | :n | :n :j | :r | :s | :t :j | :t :s  ] ! S9, initial b
                                |                                                                        ! gábdev
                                :d (Cns:0) [ :j | :n | :n :j ]                                           ! S7, initial d
                                |                                                                        ! iednev
                                :g (Cns:0) :ŋ                                                            ! S7, initial g
                                |                                                                        ! låg0ŋot
                                :k (Cns:0) [ :n | :k ]                                                   ! S7, initial k
                                |
                                :g (Cns:0) :n                                                            !däggna:degna                        
                             ]                                                                           !
                             |
                             :r (Cns:0)   :s :j :t                                                    ! S9, rsjt, bårsjtav
                  ]
               ]
                 - [
                     [ d t [s|j] ] |  b b | d d | g g | k [ s | t | t j | t s ]  |
                     f ':0 f | l ':0 l | m ':0 m | n ':0 n | n ':0 n j | ŋ ':0 ŋ | r ':0 r | s ':0 s | s ':0 s j | v ':0 v
                     ]
             ];
 LowerG1   =   (Cns:0)   LCnsPhon ;
 LowerG12  = [ LowerG1 | LowerG2 ] ;


 G32 =  f ':0 f | l ':0 l | m ':0 m | n ':0 n | n ':0 n j | ŋ ':0 ŋ | r ':0 r | s ':0 s | s ':0 s j | v ':0 v ;

 G3 =[Cns Cns Cns Cns|
 [b|:b] b m|
 [d|:d] d [n|j]|
 [g|:g] g ŋ|
 k k n|
 l l [d|j|t]|
 m m [b|p]|
 n n d|
 ŋ ŋ [g|k]|
 p p [s|t]|
 s s[k|m|n|t]|
 b [d d|j j|l l|n n|r r|s s]|
 j [b b|d d|g g|k k|l l|m m| (h) n n|ŋ ŋ|p p|r r|s s|t t|v v]|
 l [b b|f f|g g|k k|m m|ŋ ŋ|p p|s s|v v]|
 m [k k|s s]|
 n s s|
  ŋ [n n |t t]|
  r [b b|[d|:d] d|f f|g g|j j|k k|m m|n n|ŋ ŋ|p p|s s|t t|v v|d d]|
  v [d d|g g|k k|l l| (h) n n|ŋ ŋ|r r|s s|t t]|
  h [[k|:k] k|[p|:p] p|[t|:t] t]|
  d t [j|s]|
  b b|d d|g g|
  k[s|t[j|s]]] ;

!diphtsimpl IF Vow: G32 AND G2 context - [Y6 Y7 Y9];
! oa:å <=> Vow: G32 Vow: WeG ; ! Evt. a subset of WeG, if only some WeG Dummys trigger diphtsimpl

!!1.86, let's see
!
!Definitions
!
!! CnsPhon = [ [ Cns7 | Cns8: ] | n j | s j | t j | t s ] ;
!! G3      = [ [ CnsPhon CnsPhon [ CnsPhon+ | '] ] - [[[j|l|m|n|v] s t ] | [l|r] s k | r s j t ] ] ;
!! G2      = [   CnsPhon CnsPhon |                   [[[j|l|m|n|v] s t ] | [l|r] s k | r s j t ] ] ;
!! G1      =     CnsPhon ;
!! G12     = [ G1 | G2 ] ;
!
! LowerCnsPhon = [ :Cns7 | :n :j | :s :j | :t :j | :t :s ] ;
! LowerG2  = [ (Cns:0)  LowerCnsPhon (Cns:0) LowerCnsPhon (Cns:0) |
!              (Cns:0) [[[:j|:l|:m|:n|:v] :s :t ] |
!              (Cns:0) [:l|:r] :s :k |
!              (Cns:0)  :r :s :j :t ] ] ;
! LowerG1  = (Cns:0)   LowerCnsPhon ;
! LowerG12 = [ LowerG1 | LowerG2 ] ;


Rules


! Consonant alternations in certain pos
! -------------------------------------

! This is a dummy negative test, in order to get the test paradigm work.
!$ a
!$ b


"Word Final Devoicing of Certain Single Consonants d9 etc."
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (Cns:) (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ] ;
       where Cx in ( b9 d9 g9 m9 h9 )
             Cy in ( p  t  k  v  j  )
	   matched ;
!€ iemed9#
!€ iemet0

"Word final weakening -tj and -ttj to -sj part 1"
 t:s <= Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) ( d: ) _ j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ] ;


"Word final weakening -tj and -ttj to -sj part 2"
 t:s => Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) ( d: ) _ j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ] ;
 KEEPIF(SHORTCOMP)
        Vow:               h:0 _ [j|s] Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !facultative in first-part compounds, ts too
 ENDKEEP
! t:s <=> Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ ( t: ) j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) (Hyph) #: ;
!€ jågåtj#
!€ jågåsj0

!"Word final weakening of -ttj to -sj"
! t:0 <=> Vow: t:s _ j (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) #: ;
! oajválattja : oajválasj This is moved to the t:0 rule set.
! Still, this will fail if and when clitics are added to the word.
! d:s changed to d:

"Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8"
  Cx:0 <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) X3: ;
	where Cx in ( DelCns ) ;
! The twoL-sme had [X4:|X8:|X6: Cons:|X9:], be prepared to
! expand this rule accordingly.

!€ loavddag8X3#
!€ l0åv0da000


"Word Final Neutralization of g8, h8, m8"
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) X2: (Hyph) [ # | #: ] ;
			where Cx in (g8 h8 m8)
			      Cy in (t  t  n )
			matched ;
! The twol-sme had [X2: | X7: ], be prepared to expand this rule accordingly.
! Since we use X2, the "2" in g8 etc. may be superfluous...

!"Word-final Devoicing of d9, m9"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) #: ;
!       where Cx in ( d9 m9 )
!	          Cy in ( t  v  )
!	     matched ;
! iemet:iemeda


"Deleting Final h9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
 h9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final l9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
 l9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) [Q1:|X3:] X1: n ;

"Deleting Final m9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
 m9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final n9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
 n9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final r9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
 r9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;



!      where Cx in ( s m h ) ;
! originally it was true for s, m, h. Keep an eye on this.

!"Word Final Cluster Simplification"  ! málestit : máles
! t:0 <=> Vow (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) s _ (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) (Hyph) #:  ;
!be prepared to define more rules on cluster simpl.
!moved to Consonant gradation
!€ málest#
!€ máles00


! Vowel lengthening
! -----------------
